New Jersey, session 222, A4373.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Within 24 hours of being notified of a bias incident, the Attorney General shall make available to the public on the Internet website of the Department of Law and Public Safety, and shall direct the prosecutor of the county in which the incident occurred to make available to the public on the county prosecutors Internet website, information regarding: (1)   the suspected bias incident including, but not limited to, relevant facts and circumstances related to the incident in order to obtain assistance from the public to investigate and prosecute the incident; and (2)   how the public may contact the Attorney Generals Office, the county prosecutors office, or the local law enforcement agency to provide information related to the incident. b.  Within 24 hours of being notified of a bias incident, the chief law enforcement officer of the municipality in which the bias incident occurred, or the Superintendent of State Police if the incident occurred in a municipality that does not have a full-time police department, shall make information available to the public on the Internet website of the municipality and the local law enforcement agency or New Jersey State Police, as appropriate, regarding: (1)   the suspected bias incident including, but not limited to, relevant facts and circumstances related to the incident in order to obtain assistance from the public to investigate and prosecute the incident; and (2)   how the public may contact the Attorney Generals Office, county prosecutors office, or local law enforcement agency to provide information related to the incident. c.     The Attorney General, county prosecutor, and chief law enforcement officer or Superintendent of State Police, as appropriate, shall provide updated information on the appropriate Internet website regarding the final disposition of the bias incident investigation. As used in this section, bias incident means a suspected or confirmed violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:16-1. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.